Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
ARTICLE 26
BONDS

Cross references:

(1) For the constitutional provision that establishes limitations on spending, the imposition of taxes, and the incurring of debt, see § 20 of art. X, Colo. Const.

(2) For definitions applicable to this article, see § 30-26-301 (2)(d).

Section

PART 1 BONDS - FUNDING -
FLOATING INDEBTEDNESS

PART 2 BONDS - FUNDING AND
REFUNDING BY NEW COUNTY

PART 3 BONDS - BUILDINGS,
ROADS, OTHER

PART 4 BONDS - REFUNDING

PART 5 COUNTY CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT
TRUST FUNDS